New York, session 2025-2026, A5065.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 11, 12 and 13 of section 215 of the public 2 service law are renumbered subdivisions 12, 13 and 14 and a new subdivi- 3 sion 11 is added to read as follows: 4 11. To the extent permitted by, and not contrary to applicable federal 5 law and rules and regulations, formulate a process, rules and regu- 6 lations for the regulation of the charges and fees of internet and cable 7 providers, including television rates and other services that the inter- 8 net and cable providers deliver, including requests for increases and 9 changes in the amount of fees and charges; 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 11 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 12 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 13 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 14 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03365-01-5